Maryland, session 2025, HB1304.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
2–1261.
(a) On or before October 31 each year, the Department of Public Safety and
Correctional Services shall submit to the Department, in the form of electronic raw data,
de–identified and disaggregated by age, race, and sex, information required to be reported
to the Governor in accordance with § 3–207(a)(2) of the Correctional Services Article.
(b) (1) On or before November 30 each year, the Department of State Police
shall submit to the Department, in a format that the Executive Director requires, the
information collected in accordance with § 2–307(a)(2) of the Public Safety Article.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1304*

HOUSE BILL 1304
(2) On or before August 1, 2022, the Department of State Police and the
Department shall enter into a memorandum of understanding, the terms of which shall
include:
(i) a data sharing agreement for all information collected in
accordance with § 2–307 of the Public Safety Article;
(ii) a work plan for access to collected data for research and
statistical analysis purposes;
(iii) a listing of all data fields collected for the Crime in Maryland
Report and the Hate Bias Report; and
(iv) an update on the status of compliance with the National
Incident–Based Reporting System by law enforcement agencies in the State.
(C) (1) ON OR BEFORE NOVEMBER 30 EACH YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT OF
STATE POLICE SHALL SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT, IN ELECTRONIC FORMAT,
INFORMATION COLLECTED THROUGH THE UNIFORM CRIME REPORTING PROGRAM
ON THE FOLLOWING CRIME CATEGORIES:
(I) CRIMINAL HOMICIDE;
(II) FORCIBLE RAPE;
(III) ROBBERY;
(IV) ASSAULT;
(V) BREAKING OR ENTERING;
(VI) LARCENY OR THEFT;
(VII) MOTOR VEHICLE THEFT; AND
(VIII) ARSON.
(2) THE INFORMATION REQUIRED TO BE SUBMITTED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING
INFORMATION FOR EACH INCIDENT:
(I) OFFENSE, INCLUDING OFFENSE SUBTYPE;
(II) DATE, COUNTY, ZIP CODE, AND INCIDENT LOCATION;

HOUSE BILL 1304 3
(III) WHETHER AN ARREST WAS MADE;
(IV) WHETHER AN INCIDENT WAS DESIGNATED A HATE INCIDENT
OR HATE CRIME;
(V) AGE, RACE, ETHNICITY, AND SEX OF VICTIM;
(VI) AGE, RACE, ETHNICITY, AND SEX OF OFFENDER;
(VII) LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES INVOLVED;
(VIII) CASE CLEARANCE STATUS; AND
(IX) IF THE OFFENSE IS ARSON, TYPE OF PROPERTY.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE SHALL CREATE A WORK
PLAN THAT:
(I) IMPROVES AND STREAMLINES CRIME DATA COLLECTION
AND REPORTING WITH RESPECT TO THE UNIFORM CRIME REPORTING PROGRAM;
(II) OUTLINES POLICIES AND PROCEDURES TO COLLECT AND
MEASURE HATE INCIDENTS AND HATE CRIMES IN A MORE EFFICIENT MANNER; AND
(III) CREATES PROCEDURES THAT ALLOW VICTIMS TO EASILY
REPORT AND DESIGNATE AN INCIDENT AS A SUSPECTED HATE CRIME ON THE
APPROPRIATE FORMS.
(4) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND
GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE, ON:
(I) THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPHS (1) AND
(2) OF THIS SUBSECTION BY JUNE 30, 2026, AND EACH YEAR THEREAFTER; AND
(II) THE WORK PLAN REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION BY JUNE 30, 2026.
[(c)] (D) On or before October 31 each year, the Maryland Police Training and
Standards Commission shall submit to the Department, in the form of electronic raw data,
de–identified and disaggregated by agency and incident:
(1) information required to be reported to the General Assembly in
accordance with § 3–514(b)(1) of the Public Safety Article; and

HOUSE BILL 1304
(2) information required to be collected in accordance with § 3–207(b) of the
Public Safety Article.
[(d)] (E) On or before October 31 each year, the Governor’s Office of Crime
Prevention and Policy shall submit to the Department, in the form of electronic raw data,
de–identified and disaggregated by incident, information collected in accordance with:
(1) § 3–528 of the Public Safety Article; and
(2) § 25–113 of the Transportation Article.
[(e)] (F) On or before August 1, 2022, the Department of Juvenile Services and
the Department shall enter into a memorandum of understanding, the terms of which shall
include:
(1) the provision of various custom reports to the Department, including
information, de–identified and disaggregated by juvenile, relating to the juvenile’s record
of:
(i) delinquency;
(ii) court actions;
(iii) supervision; and
(iv) placement; and
(2) the development of a work plan by the Department of Juvenile Services
regarding efforts to include specific race and ethnicity data for individual juveniles.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.